Utah statutes.
20A-9-402.   General requirements for all primary elections.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the lieutenant governor, county clerks, and election judges shall follow the procedures and requirements of this title in administering primary elections.

(2)  If there is any conflict between any provision of this part and any other sections in Title 20A, this part takes precedence.

